Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.365

Vital records.

All or part of any vital records, reports, supporting documentation, vital statistics, data, or information contained therein under chapter 70.58A RCW are not subject to public inspection and copying under this chapter.

[ 2019 c 148 s 39.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Rule-making authority—2019 c 148: See RCW 70.58A.901 and 70.58A.902.